Hawaii, session 2025, HB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 266-61, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§266-61  Labor subject to collective bargaining; required.  [In] (a)  Except as provided in subsection (b), in addition to the duties of the department of transportation imposed under part I, the department of transportation shall require that the securing of mooring lines from vessels to commercial docks, wharves, piers, quays, and landings be performed by labor subject to collective bargaining[; provided that nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring that any]. (b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to: (1)  Any labor being performed at any shipyard or drydock; by or on behalf of any ship repair or construction company; or involving any activity relating to ship repair, construction and overhaul services, and maritime research and development [be subject to collective bargaining.]; and (2)  The securing of mooring lines from government-owned or government-sponsored vessels, training vessels, and fishing vessels." SECTION 2. This Act shall not be applied so as to impair any contract existing as of the effective date of the Act in a manner violative of either the Constitution of the State of Hawaii or article I, section 10, of the United States Constitution. SECTION 3. The provisions of this Act shall be enforced to the extent they are not held to conflict with any federal or state constitutional provision, law, rule, or regulation.  The provisions of this Act are not severable and if any provision of the Act, or the application therof to any person or circumstance is held to conflict with any deferral or state constitutional provision, law, rule, or regulation, this Act, in its entirety shall be invalid. SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST